Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1012

Statement of dissolution.

(1) A limited cooperative association that has dissolved or is about to dissolve may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of dissolution that states:

(a) The name of the association;

(b) The date the association dissolved or will dissolve; and

(c) Any other information the association considers relevant.

(2) A person has notice of a limited cooperative association's dissolution on the later of:

(a) Ninety days after a statement of dissolution is filed; or

(b) The effective date stated in the statement of dissolution.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1012.]